Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB762.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 31.010 is amended to read as follows:
There is hereby established as an independent agency of state government, attached for administrative purposes to the
Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, the Department of Public Advocacy, in order to provide for the establishment,
maintenance, and operation of a state-sponsored and controlled system for:
(1) The representation of [indigent ]persons accused of serious crimes, as authorized under this chapter[ or
mental states which may result in their incarceration or confinement]; and
(2) (a) The pursuit of legal, administrative, and other appropriate remedies to ensure the protection of the rights
of persons with disabilities, independent of any agency that provides treatment, services, or
rehabilitation to persons with disabilities.
(b) As used in[For the purposes of] this chapter, "persons with disabilities" means[shall refer to those]
persons eligible for protection and advocacy services under Pub. L. Nos.[Public Laws] 99-319, 102-
569, 103-218, 106-170, and 106-402, as amended, and any other federal enabling statute hereafter
enacted that defines the eligible client base for protection and advocacy services.
Section 2. KRS 31.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Department of Public Advocacy shall consist of the public advocate, deputy public advocate, general
counsel, [such ]assistant public advocates as the public advocate shall deem necessary, and [such ]secretarial
and other personnel as the public advocate shall deem necessary.
(2) (a) The public advocate shall:
1. Be appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) attorneys submitted to him or her by the
Public Advocacy Commission;
2. [shall ]Be an attorney licensed to practice law in Kentucky with at least five (5) years of
experience in the practice of law;
3. [shall ]Be excepted from the classified service;
4. [shall ]Be the chief administrator of the Department of Public Advocacy and an appointing
authority as [that term is ]defined in KRS 18A.005; and
5. [shall ]Serve a term of four (4) years, which is renewable, unless removed by the Governor.
(b) The incumbent public advocate shall serve until a successor is nominated by the commission and
approved by the Governor. The compensation of the public advocate shall be set by [the provisions of
]KRS 64.640.
(3) The deputy public advocate shall:
(a) Be an attorney;[ and]
(b) [shall ]Be appointed by the public advocate; and
(c) [shall ]Serve at the[his or her] pleasure of the public advocate.
(4) The general counsel shall:
(a) Be an attorney;[ and]
(b) [shall ]Be appointed by the public advocate;[ and]
(c) [shall ]Serve at the[his or her] pleasure of the public advocate; and[.]
(d) [The general counsel shall ]Represent the interests of the department as directed by the public advocate.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(5) The assistant public advocates shall:
(a) Be attorneys;[,]
(b) [shall ]Be appointed by the public advocate;[,]
(c) [shall ]Be covered by the merit system;[,] and
(d) [shall ]Not be subject to [the provisions of ]KRS 12.210.
(6) Secretarial, clerical, and other personnel shall be appointed by the public advocate and shall be covered by the
merit system.
Section 3. KRS 31.030 is amended to read as follows:
The authority and duties of the Department of Public Advocacy shall include but are not limited to:
(1) Administering the statewide public advocacy system created by this chapter or by any other appropriate
legislation or court decision;
(2) Developing policies[and promulgating standards and administrative regulations, rules,] and procedures for
administration of the defense of indigent defendants in criminal cases that the public advocate, statutes, or the
courts determine are subject to public assistance;
(3) Determining necessary personnel for the department and appointing staff attorneys, who shall be ["]assistant
public advocates,["] and non-lawyer assistants within the merit system, subject to available funding and
employee allotments;
(4) Maintaining and exercising control over the department's information technology system, and working with
the Commonwealth Office of Technology to ensure that the department's information technology is in
conformity with the requirements of state government;
(5) Conducting research into, and developing and implementing methods of, improving the operation of the
criminal justice system with regard to indigent defendants and other defendants in criminal actions, including
participation in groups, organizations, and projects dedicated to improving representation of defendants in
criminal actions in particular, or the interests of indigent or impoverished persons in general;
(6) Issuing rules, promulgating administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, and establishing
standards as may be reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, the decisions of the
United States Supreme Court, the decisions of the Kentucky Supreme Court, Court of Appeals, and other
applicable court decisions or statutes;
(7) Being authorized to pursue legal, administrative, and other appropriate remedies to ensure the protection of the
rights of persons with disabilities;
(8) Being authorized to purchase liability insurance for the protection of all full-time public advocates, deputy
public advocates, and assistant public advocates to protect them from liability for malpractice arising in the
course or scope of employment and for the protection of attorneys with whom the Department of Public
Advocacy contracts to protect them from liability for malpractice arising in the course or scope of the contract;
(9) Being authorized to seek,[ and] apply for, and solicit funds for the operation of the defense of indigent persons
or protection of the persons with disabilities programs from any source, public or private, and to receive
donations, grants, awards, and similar funds from any legal source. Those funds shall be placed in a special
account for the Department of Public Advocacy and, notwithstanding KRS 45.229, those funds shall not
lapse;
(10) Being authorized to assign an attorney, including a conflict attorney under a plan, for good cause, at any stage
of representation, including trial, appeal, or other post-conviction or post-disposition proceeding, including
discharge revocation hearings, preliminary parole revocation hearings, and conditional discharge revocation
hearings, regardless of whether the hearings are conducted by constitutional judges or executive branch
administrative law judges;
(11) Filing an annual report with the Legislative Research Commission [an annual report, ]by September 30 of
each year, for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Judiciary, informing the public of the work of all
divisions of the department and setting forth the total number and types of cases assigned to the department
by county, the average number of cases per department attorney, all funding available to the department, the
average amount of state funds expended per assigned case, and any other information requested by the
Legislative Research Commission or that the public advocate finds necessary to inform the General Assembly,

CHAPTER 136 3
the judicial or executive branches, or the public of the activities conducted by the department during the
previous fiscal year;[ and]
(12) Performing[Do] other activities and instituting[institute] other programs as necessary to carry out the
provisions of this chapter, or those decisions or statutes which are the subject of this section;[.]
(13) (a) Within sixty (60) days of the end of each fiscal year, filing with[the department shall submit to] the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services and the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the
Interim Joint Committees on Judiciary and Families and Children a report detailing:
1. The number of alternative sentencing plans submitted to courts that recommended treatment by
providers that were nonqualified treatment programs;
2. A breakdown of the number of [such ]plans described in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph that
were approved, denied, or amended by the courts; and
3. A listing of all treatment programs recommended that did not meet the requirements of a
qualified treatment program.
(b) As counsel appointed to provide legal representation to an individual under KRS Chapter 31, the
department or defense counsel serves at the direction or request of the represented individual and may
make recommendations for substance abuse treatment services from a treatment provider that is not a
qualified treatment program but shall adhere to the reporting requirements in KRS 222.427(3); and[.]
(14) Requiring alternative sentencing workers as defined in KRS 31.252 [shall be required ]to:
(a) Obtain a minimum of twelve (12) hours of continuing education pertaining to substance use disorder;
and
(b) Comply with KRS 222.429.
Section 4. KRS 31.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A needy person who is being detained by a law enforcement officer, on suspicion of having committed, or who
is under formal charge of having committed, or is being detained under a conviction of, a serious crime, or
who is accused of having committed a public or status offense or who has been committed to the Department
of Juvenile Justice or Cabinet for Health and Family Services for having committed a public or status offense
as those are defined by KRS 610.010(1), 610.010(2)(a), (b), (c), or 630.020(2) is entitled:
(a) To be represented by an attorney to the same extent as a person having his or her own counsel is so
entitled; and
(b) Except as provided in subsection (2)(c) of this section, to be provided with the necessary services and
facilities of representation, including investigation and other preparation. The courts in which the
defendant is tried shall waive all costs.
(2) A needy person who is entitled to be represented by an attorney under subsection (1) of this section is entitled
to be:
(a) [To be ]Counseled and defended at all stages of the matter beginning with the earliest time when a
person providing his or her own counsel would be entitled to be represented by an attorney,[ and]
including revocation of probation or parole;
(b) [To be ]Represented in any appeal; and
(c) [To be ]Represented in any other post-conviction, or, if a minor under the age of eighteen (18), post-
disposition proceeding, including any appeal from a post-conviction or post-disposition action.
However, if the department and the court of competent jurisdiction determines that it is not a
proceeding that a reasonable person with adequate means would be willing to bring at his or her own
expense, there shall be no further right to be represented by counsel under [the provisions of ]this
chapter. In cases involving a minor under the age of eighteen (18), prior to making a determination on
whether or not a post-disposition action is a proceeding that a reasonable person with adequate means
would be willing to bring at his or her own expense, an attorney with the department shall be granted
access to the court file of the minor:
1. Without the requirement of a formal court order in which the attorney has provided a release
signed by the minor or the minor's legal guardian authorizing the use of the records; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
2. Notwithstanding any other statute prohibiting the disclosure of a juvenile court file.
(3) A needy person's right to a benefit under subsection (1) or (2) of this section is not affected by his or her
having provided a similar benefit at his or her own expense, or by he or she having waived it, at an earlier
stage.
(4) A person, whether a needy person or not, who is a minor under the age of eighteen (18) and who is in the
custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice and is residing in a residential treatment center or detention
center is entitled to be represented on a legal claim related to his or her confinement involving violations of
federal or state statutory rights or constitutional rights. Prior to representation, an attorney with the department
shall be granted access to the court file of the minor and residential treatment center or detention center records
pertaining to the juvenile:
(a) Without entering an appearance as an attorney of record; and
(b) Notwithstanding any other statute prohibiting the disclosure of a juvenile's record, including KRS
15A.0651, 610.320, 610.340, or 610.345.
(5) A person, whether a needy person or not, who is subject to a proceeding under KRS Chapter 202C and is
unrepresented at any time shall be entitled to the same rights of representation as a needy person under
subsection (1) of this section.
(6) The department shall provide representation under this section to a person who is accused of being in
contempt of court for noncompliance with a court-ordered obligation only when the obligation arises out
of:
(a) A criminal prosecution or conviction; or
(b) An action or adjudication for a public or status offense.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 31 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
The Department of Public Advocacy shall not provide or be compelled to provide legal representation except as
authorized in Section 4 of this Act.
Section 6. KRS 31.211 is amended to read as follows:
(1) At arraignment, the court shall conduct a nonadversarial hearing to determine whether a person who has
requested a public defender is able to pay a partial fee for legal representation, the other necessary services and
facilities of representation, and court costs. The court shall order payment in an amount determined by the
court and may order that the payment be made in a lump sum or by installment payments to recover money for
representation provided under this chapter. This partial fee determination shall be made at each stage of the
proceedings.
(2) If the partial fee, or any portion thereof, is not paid by the due date, the court's order shall be considered[is] a
civil judgment subject to collection under Civil Rule 69.03 and KRS Chapter 426.
(3) All moneys collected by the public advocate from indigent defendants pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section shall be credited to the Department of Public Advocacy special trust and agency account to be used to
support the state public advocacy system.
(4) If a person receives legal assistance or other benefit under this chapter to which he or she is not entitled or if a
person receives legal assistance under this chapter and is financially able to pay for representation on the date
the suit is brought, the public advocate, on behalf of the Commonwealth, shall recover, where practical,
payment or reimbursement, as the case may be, from the person who received the legal assistance or from his
or her estate. Any suit seeking recovery under this subsection shall be brought within five (5) years after the
date on which the aid was received.
(5) [Department of Public Advocacy ]Attorneys providing representation under this chapter shall forward all
information that indicates that payment or reimbursement may be obtained pursuant to subsection (4) of this
section to the public advocate.
(6) The duty of recovery contemplated by subsection (4) of this section shall extend against persons who were the
custodial parents or guardians of unemancipated minors at the time these minors were deemed needy as
defined in KRS 31.100(5)(c) or (d).
(7) All moneys collected under this section shall be placed in a special trust and agency account for the
Department of Public Advocacy, and, notwithstanding KRS 45.229, the funds shall not lapse.

CHAPTER 136 5
Section 7. KRS 31.215 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Except for attorneys appointed pursuant to KRS 620.100, 625.041, 625.080, and 31.120, an[no]
attorney providing representation under this chapter[employed by the Department of Public
Advocacy] shall not accept any fees from any source other than the Department of Public Advocacy
for the representation of any needy person in any case or matter assigned to the attorney, or in any
matter directly related to a case or matter assigned to the attorney.[as defined in this chapter from that
person or anyone for his or her benefit and]
(b) The compensation[fees] for representation of a needy[that] person under this chapter shall be limited
to that which is[the fees] provided by the department.
(c) This subsection shall not prohibit an attorney who is not employed by the department from accepting
fees for the representation of any person in any case or matter unrelated to any case or matter that he
or she has been assigned under[in] this chapter.
(d) As used in this subsection, "fees" shall include cash, property, or other pecuniary benefits of any kind.
(2) This section shall not apply to unsolicited gifts of de minimis value that are given by or on behalf of a needy
person to any attorney after the conclusion of a case or matter as a token of appreciation for the work of the
attorney.
(3) Any attorney who violates this section[employed by the Department of Public Advocacy who receives or
attempts to collect a fee from a needy person as prohibited by subsection (1) above] shall be guilty of a Class
D felony.
Section 8. KRS 31.219 is amended to read as follows:
(1) It shall be the duty of the attorney providing representation under this chapter[employed by the Department
of Public Advocacy representing a client at trial] to file a notice of appeal after a proceeding from which an
appeal is authorized if his or her client requests an appeal.
(2) After the trial attorney providing representation under this chapter[ employed by the Department of Public
Advocacy] has filed a notice of appeal as required by the Rules of Criminal Procedure, he or she shall forward
to the Appeals Branch of the Department of Public Advocacy a copy of the final judgment, the notice of
appeal, a statement of any errors committed in the trial of the case which should be raised on appeal, and a
designation of that part of the record that is essential to the appeal.
(3) Any attorney providing representation under this chapter[employed by the Department of Public Advocacy
who is representing a client] on an appeal and who, after a conscientious examination of the[said] appeal
believes the appeal to be wholly frivolous after careful examinations of the record, may request the court to
which the appeal has been taken for permission to withdraw from the case. The attorney shall[must] file with
that request a brief which sets forth any arguments which might possibly be raised on appeal. A copy of the
request for permission to withdraw and the brief shall[must] be served upon the client in sufficient time so that
the client may raise any argument he or she chooses to raise.
Section 9. KRS 202A.121 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon the appearance of the person detained pursuant to KRS 202A.041 or upon the filing of a petition
pursuant to KRS 202A.051 or 202A.0811, the court shall appoint an attorney to represent the respondent. The
attorney shall be paid a fee fixed by the court not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500), which shall be paid
by the Finance and Administration Cabinet.
(2) The[with such] appointment and representation under subsection (1) of this section shall[to] continue unless
the respondent retains private counsel.
(3) The appointed attorney shall be immediately[forthwith] notified by the clerk of the allegations in the petition
and the date and purpose of the preliminary hearing.
(4) Notwithstanding KRS 202A.091, an attorney appointed by the court or retained by the respondent shall be
given access to the court records relating to the petition.
Section 10. KRS 533.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) When a person who has been convicted of an offense or who has entered a plea of guilty to an offense is not
sentenced to imprisonment, the court shall place him or her on probation if he or she is in need of the
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
supervision, guidance, assistance, or direction that the probation service can provide. Conditions of probation
shall be imposed as provided in KRS 533.030, but the court may modify or enlarge the conditions or, if the
defendant commits an additional offense or violates a condition, revoke the sentence at any time prior to the
expiration or termination of the period of probation. When setting conditions under this subsection, the court
shall not order any defendant to pay incarceration costs or any other cost permitted to be ordered under KRS
533.010 or other statute, except restitution and any costs owed to the Department of Corrections, through the
circuit clerk.
(2) When a person who has been convicted of an offense or who has entered a plea of guilty to an offense is not
sentenced to imprisonment, the court may sentence him or her to probation with an alternative sentence if it is
of the opinion that the defendant should conduct himself or herself according to conditions determined by the
court and that probationary supervision alone is insufficient. The court may modify or enlarge the conditions
or, if the defendant commits an additional offense or violates a condition, revoke the sentence at any time prior
to the expiration or termination of the alternative sentence.
(3) When a person who has been convicted of an offense or who has entered a plea of guilty to an offense is not
sentenced to imprisonment, the court may sentence him or her to conditional discharge if it is of the opinion
that the defendant should conduct himself or herself according to conditions determined by the court but that
probationary supervision is inappropriate. Conditions of conditional discharge shall be imposed as provided in
KRS 533.030, but the court may modify or enlarge the conditions or, if the defendant commits an additional
offense or violates a condition, revoke the sentence at any time prior to the expiration or termination of the
period of conditional discharge.
(4) (a) The period of probation, probation with an alternative sentence, or conditional discharge shall be fixed
by the court and at any time may be extended or shortened by a duly entered court order or as modified
by the Department of Corrections through the application of probation program credits under KRS
439.268.
(b) 1. Any[Such] period of supervision imposed under paragraph (a) of this subsection, with
extensions thereof, shall not exceed five (5) years, or the time necessary to complete restitution,
whichever is longer, upon conviction of a felony, nor two (2) years, or the time necessary to
complete restitution, whichever is longer, upon conviction of a misdemeanor.
2. If a violation of any condition imposed by the court during a period of supervision imposed
under paragraph (a) of this subsection is alleged to have occurred within the last sixty (60)
days of the period of supervision, the court shall have sixty (60) days after the expiration of the
period of supervision imposed under paragraph (a) of this subsection to determine if a
violation occurred and the appropriate action for the violation.
(c) 1. If a defendant who is subject to a period of supervision under paragraph (a) of this subsection
is alleged to have committed a violation of the conditions imposed by the court, and a warrant
has been issued by the court based on an allegation of that violation, the time between the
issuance of the warrant and the defendant's first appearance before the court after service of
that warrant shall be tolled and not count towards any period of supervision imposed under
paragraph (a) of this subsection, unless the court finds that the defendant did not violate any
condition imposed by the court.
2. The court shall have sixty (60) days after the defendant's first appearance to schedule and
complete any proceedings related to an alleged violation described in subparagraph 1. of this
paragraph.
(d) Upon completion of the probationary period, probation with an alternative sentence, or the period of
conditional discharge, the defendant shall be deemed finally discharged, provided no warrant issued by
the court is pending against him or her, and probation, probation with an alternative sentence, or
conditional discharge has not been revoked.
(5) Notwithstanding the fact that a sentence to probation, probation with an alternative sentence, or conditional
discharge can subsequently be modified or revoked, a judgment that[which] includes such a sentence shall
constitute a final judgment for purposes of appeal.
Section 11. The secretary of the Personnel Cabinet is directed to work with the Department of Public
Advocacy to develop and implement a new classification series for Department of Public Advocacy Attorneys that
will have a minimum entry level starting salary of at least $67,500 annually, effective no later than September 16,
2026. When the new classification series is implemented, the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet and the Department

CHAPTER 136 7
of Public Advocacy shall grant existing attorneys, currently classified as Staff Attorney I, II, III, Staff Attorney
Supervisor, or Staff Attorney Manager/Asst General Counsel a 10% increase in annual compensation or an annual
salary of $67,500, whichever is greater, as they are reallocated to the new classification series.
Signed by Governor April 13, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version